Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.170

Particular causes of challenge.

Particular causes of challenge are of three kinds:

(1) For such a bias as when the existence of the facts is ascertained, in judgment of law disqualifies the juror, and which is known in this code as implied bias.

(2) For the existence of a state of mind on the part of the juror in reference to the action, or to either party, which satisfies the court that the challenged person cannot try the issue impartially and without prejudice to the substantial rights of the party challenging, and which is known in this code as actual bias.

(3) For the existence of a defect in the functions or organs of the body which satisfies the court that the challenged person is incapable of performing the duties of a juror in the particular action without prejudice to the substantial rights of the party challenging.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 203 s 3; Code 1881 s 211; 1877 p 44 s 215; 1869 p 52 s 215; RRS s 329.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The word "code" appeared in Code 1881 s 211.

Qualification of jurors: RCW 2.36.070.